Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 20.5
INTEGRATED CRIMINAL JUSTICE
INFORMATION SYSTEM

Section

16-20.5-101. Short title.

This article and article 21 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the "Criminal Justice Information System Act".

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 598, § 1, effective May 22.

16-20.5-101.5. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and determines that, since 1974, there have been proposals for an automated criminal justice information system that shares and tracks data concerning offenders among the various criminal justice agencies. Because each of the criminal justice agencies in the state has developed independent information systems to address each agency's own management and planning needs, the status of criminal justice information in the state has been fragmented.

The general assembly hereby declares that this article is enacted for the purpose of developing, operating, supporting, maintaining, and enhancing, in a cost-effective manner, a seamless, integrated criminal justice information system that maximizes standardization of data and communications technology among law enforcement agencies, district attorneys, the courts, and state-funded corrections for adult and youth offenders and other agencies as approved by the general assembly or by the executive board pursuant to this article. Such a system will improve:

Public safety by making more timely, accurate, and complete information concerning offenders available statewide to all criminal justice agencies and to individual decision-makers in the criminal justice system, including but not limited to police officers, prosecutors, judges, probation officers, and corrections officers;

Decision-making by increasing the availability of statistical measures for evaluating public policy;

Productivity of existing staff by continually working toward eliminating redundant data collection and input efforts among the agencies and by reducing or eliminating paper-based processing;

Access to timely, accurate, and complete information by both staff from all criminal justice agencies and the public when permitted by article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Because information about offenders collected by local law enforcement agencies may be the most current, the general assembly directs criminal justice agencies, where practical, to cooperate with and to encourage local law enforcement agencies to participate in the Colorado integrated criminal justice information system program developed under this article.

The general assembly hereby finds that the Colorado integrated criminal justice information system program has been successfully implemented and that the sharing of criminal justice information is being enhanced as a result. The general assembly further finds that there is a need to provide ongoing maintenance, support, and leadership for the continued operation and enhancement of the Colorado integrated criminal justice information system program.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the operation of the integrated criminal justice information system established by this article is critical to the accurate, complete, and timely performance of criminal background checks and to the effective communications between and among law enforcement, the state judicial department, and executive agencies and political subdivisions of the state. The general assembly further finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the citizens of the state and for the enhancement of public safety that the collaborative effort surrounding the integrated criminal justice information system be maintained, supported, and enhanced.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1030, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 941, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2001:

(5) added, p. 613, § 2, effective May 30.

L. 2005:

IP(2), (2)(a), (2)(c), (4), and (5) amended, p. 84, § 1, effective March 25.

16-20.5-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 20.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Action" means the district attorneys' case management system.

"CCIC" means the Colorado crime information center.

"Chief information officer" means the chief information officer who reports to the executive board and who is selected pursuant to section 16-20.5-103 and who is responsible for coordinating the implementation of a strategic plan for and operating, supporting, maintaining, and enhancing the integrated criminal justice information system.

"CICJIS" means the automated system of the Colorado integrated criminal justice information system program that integrates agency systems.

Repealed.

"Criminal justice agency" means any of the following: The department of public safety, department of corrections, department of human services, judicial department, Colorado district attorneys council, and other approved agencies.

"DCIS" means the department of corrections information system.

"ICON" or "eclipse" means the integrated Colorado online network that is the judicial department's case management system.

"Integrated criminal justice information system" or "system" means an automated information system capable of tracking the complete life cycle of a criminal case throughout its various stages involving different criminal justice agencies through potentially separate and individual systems and without unnecessary duplication of data collection, data storage, or data entry.

"TRAILS" means the case management system of the division of youth services of the department of human services.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 598, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 96:

(2) amended and (2.3) and (2.5) added, p. 1031, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 942, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 99:

(2.3) amended, p. 872, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 85, § 2, effective March 25.

L. 2007:

(5) repealed, p. 918, § 22, effective May 17.

L. 2017:

IP and (10) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1969, § 16, effective June 6.

16-20.5-103. Colorado integrated criminal justice information system program - executive board.

There is hereby established the Colorado integrated criminal justice information system program, referred to in this article as the "program". The program shall be a joint effort of the criminal justice agencies and other approved agencies. The program shall be implemented, maintained, supported, and enhanced by the criminal justice information program executive board, which is hereby created and referred to in this article as the "executive board". Membership of the executive board shall be comprised initially of the executive directors of the department of public safety, department of corrections, department of human services, and Colorado district attorneys council and the state court administrator. The executive board shall unanimously designate a chief information officer. Upon unanimous agreement, the executive board may approve the addition of either voting or nonvoting members.

The executive board shall be responsible and accountable for the program. The program shall include mechanisms to enable the criminal justice agencies to share data stored in each agency's information system. Initially, the program shall maximize the use of existing databases and platforms through the use of a virtual database created by a network linking existing databases and platforms among the various departments. The program shall also develop plans for new interoperable system platforms when the existing platforms become obsolete.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 599, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 96:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1031, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 86, § 3, effective March 25.

16-20.5-104. Repeal of article. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 600, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1032, § 4, effective May 23.

16-20.5-105. Task force plan for implementation - integrated criminal justice information system. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1032, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 942, § 3, effective May 27.

16-20.5-106. Approval - funding. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1033, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 943, § 4, effective May 27.

16-20.5-107. Future modifications and purchases.

The executive board shall develop and maintain a process to determine if and how changes to existing criminal justice applications impact the integrated network. Changes to criminal justice applications, databases, platforms, or business processes that have an impact on the integrated network must be coordinated through and approved by the executive board.

Any state-funded expenditures by a criminal justice agency for computer platforms, databases, or applications in support of criminal justice applications shall be reviewed and approved by the executive board. The executive board shall make recommendations concerning such purchases to all appropriate budgetary approval agencies.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1033, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 86, § 4, effective March 25.

16-20.5-108. Local criminal justice agencies pilot program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1034, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 944, § 5, effective May 27.